DI-333

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM
DTC |[co226/2 1toC 1226/26 | ABS Solenoid Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This solenoid goes on when signals are received from the ECU and controls the pressure acting on the wheel

cylinders thus controlling the braking force.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
C0226 / 21 Openorshortin SFRH or SFRR circuit continues for 0.05 * Hydraulic brake booster
sec. or more. * SFRHor SFRRcircuit
C0236 /22 Openorshortin SFLH or SFLR circuit continues for 0.05 * Hydraulic brake booster
sec. or more. * SFLH or SFLR circuit
Openorshortin SRR or SRH circuit continues for 0.05 sec. ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
C0246/ 23 .
or more. * SRR or SRHcircuit
Openorshortin SA1 circuit continues for 0.05 sec. or * Hydraulic brake booster
C1225/ 25 .
more. * SA1 circuit
Openorshortin SA2 circuit continues for 0.05 sec. or * Hydraulic brake booster
C1226/ 26 .
more. * SA2circuit

Fail safe function:

If trouble occurs in the actuator solenoid circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and pro-
hibits ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1

Check hydraulic brake booster solenoid.
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check continuity between the terminal BS and each of termi-
nals SFRH, SFRR, SFLH, SFLR, SRH, SRR, SA1 and SA2 of
hydraulic brake booster connector.
OK:
Continuity
HINT:
Resistance of each solenoid at 20 °C (68 ° F)
SFRH, SFLH, SRH: 4.75 - 5.25 Q
SFRR, SFLR, SRR: 2.00 - 2.40 @
SA1, SA2: 3.5 -3.9Q

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster.

Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS ECU
and actuator (See page IN-24).

@

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.
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